sk-SK: Technológia multiplexora: Analógové audio; Analógové video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC servo; RF; USB; WDM; Iné
hr-HR: Tehnologija multipleksera: Analogni audio; Analogni video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC servo; RF; USB; WDM; Ostalo
fr: Technologie du multiplexeur: Audio analogique; Vidéo analogique; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; Servo RC; RF; USB; WDM; Autre
lt-LT: Multiplekserio technologija: Analoginis garsas; Analoginis vaizdo įrašas; CWDM; DWDM; Eternetas; HDMI; I2C; RC servovariklis; RF; USB; WDM; Kita
zh-CN: 复用器技术: 模拟音频; 模拟视频; CWDM; DWDM; 以太网; HDMI; I2C; RC 伺服; 射频; USB; WDM; 其他
pt-BR: Tecnologia do multiplexador: Áudio analógico; Vídeo analógico; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; Servo RC; RF; USB; WDM; Outro
pl: Technologia multipleksera: Analogowe audio; Analogowe wideo; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; Serwomechanizm RC; RF; USB; WDM; Inne
fi: Moniplexer-teknologia: Analoginen ääni; Analoginen video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC-servo; Radiotaajuus; USB; WDM; Muu
it: Tecnologia del multiplexer: Audio analogico; Video analogico; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; Servo RC; RF; USB; WDM; Altro
ru: Технология мультиплексора: Аналоговый звук; Аналоговое видео; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC-сервопривод; РЧ; USB; WDM; Другой
tr: Çoklayıcı teknolojisi: Analog ses; Analog video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC servo; RF; USB; WDM; Diğer
es: Tecnología del multiplexor: Audio analógico; Video analógico; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; Servo RC; RF; USB; WDM; Otros
ja: マルチプレクサー技術: アナログオーディオ; アナログビデオ; CWDM; DWDM; イーサネット; HDMI; I2C; RCサーボ; RF; USB; WDM; その他
nb: Multiplekserteknologi: Analog lyd; Analog video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC-servo; RF; USB; WDM; Annet
da: Multiplekserteknologi: Analog lyd; Analog video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC-servo; RF; USB; WDM; Andet
th: เทคโนโลยีมัลติเพล็กเซอร์: เสียงอนาล็อก; วิดีโออนาล็อก; CWDM; DWDM; อีเทอร์เน็ต; HDMI; I2C; เซอร์โว RC; RF; USB; WDM; อื่นๆ
de: Multiplexer-Technologie: Analoges Audio; Analoges Video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC-Servo; HF; USB; WDM; Sonstiges
hu: Multiplexer-technológia: Analóg audió; Analóg videó; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC szervó; RF; USB; WDM; Egyéb
zh-TW: 多工器技術: 類比音訊; 類比視訊; CWDM; DWDM; 乙太網路; HDMI; I2C; RC 伺服; 射頻; USB; WDM; 其他
ko: 멀티플렉서 기술: 아날로그 오디오; 아날로그 비디오; CWDM; DWDM; 이더넷; HDMI; I2C; RC 서보; RF; USB; WDM; 기타
bg-BG: Технология на мултиплексора: Аналогов звук; Аналогово видео; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC серво; РЧ; USB; WDM; Други
pt-PT: Tecnologia do multiplexador: Áudio analógico; Vídeo analógico; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; Servo RC; RF; USB; WDM; Outro
ro-RO: Tehnologie multiplexor: Audio analogic; Video analogic; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; Servo RC; RF; USB; WDM; Altele
nl: Multiplexertechnologie: Analoge audio; Analoge video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC-servo; RF; USB; WDM; Andere
sv: Multiplexerteknik: Analogt ljud; Analog video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC-servo; RF; USB; WDM; Övrigt
en: Multiplexer technology: Analog audio; Analog video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC servo; RF; USB; WDM; Other
sl-SI: Tehnologija multiplekserja: Analogni zvok; Analogni video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC servo; RF; USB; WDM; Drugo
cs: Technologie multiplexeru: Analogový zvuk; Analogové video; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC servo; RF; USB; WDM; Jiné
el: Τεχνολογία πολυπλέκτη: Αναλογικός ήχος; Αναλογικό βίντεο; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; RC servo; RF; USB; WDM; Άλλο
vi: Công nghệ ghép kênh: Âm thanh analog; Video analog; CWDM; DWDM; Ethernet; HDMI; I2C; Servo RC; RF; USB; WDM; Khác